Nebraska, session 109, LB313.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB313 LB313
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-118 When a third person is liable to the employee or to the
dependents for the injury or death of the employee, the employer or
workers' compensation insurer shall be subrogated to the right of the
employee or to the dependents against such third person. The recovery by
such employer or workers' compensation insurer shall not be limited to
the amount payable as compensation to such employee or dependents, but
such employer or workers' compensation insurer may recover any amount
which such employee or his or her dependents should have been entitled to
recover.
Any recovery by the employer or workers' compensation insurer
against such third person, in excess of the compensation paid by the
employer or workers' compensation insurer after deducting the expenses of
making such recovery, shall be paid forthwith to the employee or to the
dependents and shall be treated as an advance payment by the employer or
workers' compensation insurer on account of any future installments of
compensation.
Nothing in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act shall be construed
to deny the right of an injured employee or of his or her personal
representative to bring suit against such third person in his or her own
name or in the name of the personal representative based upon such
liability, but in such event an employer or workers' compensation insurer
having paid or paying compensation to such employee or his or her
dependents shall be made a party to the suit for the purpose of
reimbursement, under the right of subrogation, of any compensation paid.
Sec. 2. Section 48-118.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-118.04 (1) A settlement of a third-party claim under the Nebraska
Workers' Compensation Act is void unless:
(a) Such settlement is agreed upon in writing by the employee or his
-2-

LB313 LB313
2025 2025
or her personal representative and the workers' compensation insurer of
the employer, if there is one, and if there is no insurer, then by the
employer; or
(b) In the absence of such agreement, the court before which the
action is pending determines that the settlement offer is fair and
reasonable considering liability, damages, and the ability of the third
person and his or her liability insurance carrier to satisfy any
judgment.
(2) If the employee or his or her personal representative or the
employer or his or her workers' compensation insurer do not agree in
writing upon distribution of the proceeds of any judgment or settlement,
the court, upon application, shall order the a fair and equitable
distribution of the proceeds as follows: of any judgment or settlement.
(a) After deducting the reasonable expenses of making the recovery,
one-third of the remainder shall be paid to the employee or his or her
personal representative;
(b) Out of the balance remaining after the deduction and payment
specified in subdivision (a) of this subsection, the employer or workers'
compensation insurer shall be paid for all compensation payments that (i)
have been made by the employer or workers' compensation insurer or (ii)
the employer or workers' compensation insurer may be obligated to make in
the future; and
(c) Any balance remaining after the distributions described in
subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection have been made shall be paid
to the employee or his or her personal representative.
Sec. 3. Original sections 48-118 and 48-118.04, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-